Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Consignees and Bailees.

Revisor’s notes. —

Pursuant to § 3, ch. 24, SLA 1966, in AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.090

“district magistrate” was changed to “district judge” and “deputy magistrate” was changed to “magistrate”.

Sec. 34.45.010.
Record of consignee or bailee.

When personal property is consigned to or deposited with a forwarding merchant, wharf, warehouse, or tavern keeper, or the keeper of a depot for the reception and storage of trunks, baggage, merchandise, or other personal property, the consignee or bailee shall immediately record a description of the property, and the date of receipt, in a book kept by the consignee or bailee.

History.

(§ 22-7-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.45.020.
Consignee’s or bailee’s notice to owner.

If the property is not left with the consignee or bailee for the purpose of being forwarded, disposed of, or kept according to directions received by the consignee or bailee, at or before the time of the reception of the property, and if the name and residence of the owner of the property is known to the person having possession of the property, the consignee or bailee shall immediately notify the owner, by letter directed to the owner and deposited in the post office, of the reception of the property.

History.

(§ 22-7-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.45.030.
Sale.

If property held by a person described in AS

34.45.010

is not claimed and taken away within one year after the time it is received, the person having possession of the property may sell the property in the manner provided in AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.080

, except that property described in AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.260

shall be reported to the Department of Revenue under AS

34.45.280

and is subject to AS

34.45.290

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 22-7-3 ACLA 1949; am § 9 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Carriers, § 470.

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Warehouses, § 172.

8 C.J.S., Bailments, §§ 9, 25-31, 33-38.

93 C.J.S., Warehousemen and Safe Depositaries, §§ 94, 97, 98.

Sec. 34.45.040.
Presale inventory and notice.

Before the property is sold, the person in possession of it shall request the district judge or magistrate in the judicial district where the property is located to inventory the property.

Upon the request the district judge or magistrate or a person, other than the holder of the property or the holder’s agent, appointed by the district judge or magistrate, shall attend and, in the presence of the holder, or the holder’s agent, shall open, examine, and inventory the property. The inventory must be in duplicate, one copy of which shall be filed with the district judge or magistrate and one copy retained by the holder of the property.

After the property is inventoried, the holder, or the holder’s agent, may give notice of an intention to sell it in the following manner:

if the name and residence of the owner of the property is known, by serving the notice upon the owner either personally, or at the owner’s place of residence or business, or by registered mail;

if the name and residence of the owner of the property is unknown to the holder, then the holder may serve the notice by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the area nearest to where the property is held.

The notice must contain (1) a reasonably correct description of the property; (2) the name and residence of the owner, if known; (3) the name and residence of the holder; (4) the amount of the charges accrued and costs incurred; and (5) a statement that the holder on a certain date, that shall be specified and may not be less than three weeks after the day on which the notice is served or, if published, on which the notice is first published, will apply to the district judge or magistrate for an order to sell the property to satisfy all charges and costs that have accrued or been incurred to that date.

History.

(§ 22-7-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.45.050.
Order of sale.

If the owner or person entitled to the possession of the property, before the date specified in the notice, fails to redeem it as provided in AS

34.45.060

, the district judge or magistrate, upon verified proof that the service or publication is filed with the court, shall enter an order directing the sale of the property at public auction on a date not less than 10 days after the order to satisfy all charges and costs.

The holder or the holder’s agent shall give public notice of sale by posting, within five miles of the place of sale, in three public places, a notice that the property will be sold at public auction. The notice must also contain a reasonably correct description of the property, the name and residence of the owner if known, the name and residence of the holder, and the time and place of sale.

History.

(§ 22-7-5 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 4 SLA 2012)

Sec. 34.45.060.
Sale at public auction.

The peace officer shall sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder in the manner provided for the sale of personal property on execution.

The sale of the property conveys good title superior to all liens, encumbrances, and mortgages, and without right of redemption; but the owner or mortgagee, at any time before the sale, may redeem the property by claiming it and paying all charges of the holder against it and all costs incurred or accrued under AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.080

up to and including the date on which the owner or mortgagee redeems it.

The proceeds from the sale shall be applied in payment, first, of all reasonable costs of sale, inventory and publishing, posting, serving and preparing notices, including the district judge’s or magistrate’s fees and the fees of the peace officer, and second, of the holder’s charges, with interest at the legal rate, against the property.

History.

(§ 22-7-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.45.070.
Proceeds of sale.

The peace officer, upon completion of the sale of the property, shall make and file with the district judge or magistrate a verified, written return of the conduct of the sale and of the application of the proceeds derived from it, and shall pay all money in excess of costs and charges to the district judge or magistrate.

The district judge or magistrate shall hold the money in trust for the owner of the property and shall pay it to the owner upon the latter’s making a written, verified claim to it, with proof of ownership, within one year after the date of the sale. If no claim is made within one year after the date of the sale, the district judge or magistrate shall immediately pay the excess proceeds to the Department of Revenue. Excess proceeds that are required to be paid over to the Department of Revenue under this section are subject to AS

34.45.280

and

34.45.330

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 22-7-7 ACLA 1949; am § 10 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.080.
Sale of perishable property.

Property of a perishable nature and subject to decay by keeping, if not taken away within 30 days after it has been left, may be sold by giving 10 days’ notice of sale. In that case the notice provided in AS

34.45.040

need not be given.

The sale shall be conducted and the proceeds of the sale shall be applied in the manner provided in AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.080

, except that property in a state of decay, or that is plainly subject to immediate decay, may be summarily sold by order of a district judge or magistrate, after inspection of it, as provided in AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.080

.

The return of the sale shall be made and the proceeds derived from it shall be applied in the manner provided in AS

34.45.060

and

34.45.070

.

History.

(§ 22-7-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.45.085.
Definition.

In AS

34.45.010

and

34.45.020

, “property” does not include property covered by AS

14.57.200

—

14.57.290

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 122 SLA 2000)

Sec. 34.45.090.
Fees of officers. [Repealed, § 14 ch 133 SLA 1986.]